Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 42 Ancillary Administration
An attorneys' fees award which was less than the statutory standard set out in this section was not an abuse of court's discretion where the bulk of the services performed by the attorneys in the probate proceedings were done on behalf of the executor in its individual capacity to obtain credits for tax payments made out of the in-state assets of the estate. Estate of Torian v. Smith, 263 Ark. 304, 564 S.W.2d 521 (1978), cert. denied, First Nat'l Bank v. Smith, 439 U.S. 883, 99 S. Ct. 223, 58 L. Ed. 2d 195 (1978).

Where executor's position was in derogation of the interests of the estate as a whole, the trial court abused its discretion in ordering the attorneys' fees to be paid from the assets of the estate. Croft v. Clark, 24 Ark. App. 16, 748 S.W.2d 149 (1988).

The probate judge has authority to approve legal fees in excess of the statutory legal fees under subsection (d) and to approve accounting fees under subsection (e). Morris v. Cullipher, 306 Ark. 646, 816 S.W.2d 878 (1991).

No abuse of discretion was shown by the trial court in the allowance of legal fees. Nabers v. Estate of Setser, 310 Ark. 194, 833 S.W.2d 375 (1992).

In the absence of proof that executor and attorney fees are unreasonable or in violation of this section, such fees will be affirmed. Swaffar v. Swaffar, 327 Ark. 235, 938 S.W.2d 552 (1997), cert. denied, 522 U.S. 820, 118 S. Ct. 73 (1997).

An administrator could not escape personal liability for an attorney's fee by showing that the court did not authorize the employment of the attorney. Tucker v. Grace, 61 Ark. 410, 33 S.W. 530 (1895) (decision under prior law).

An administrator had no power to bind an estate by an agreement to convey to an attorney a part of the estate as compensation for his professional services in defending an action for the possession of land of the estate. Bryan v. Craig, 64 Ark. 438, 44 S.W. 348 (1897) (decision under prior law).

An attorney's fee was not allowed an administrator for resisting a suit to compel him to do his duty. Jacoway v. Hall, 67 Ark. 340, 55 S.W. 12 (1900) (decision under prior law).

A probate court was without jurisdiction to allow an attorney for heirs a fee out of assets of an estate for resisting a sale of lands to pay debts. Paget v. Brogan, 67 Ark. 522, 55 S.W. 938 (1900) (decision under prior law).

Although the statutory fee schedule was not an inflexible maximum where a fee of $2,000 for the preparation of estate tax returns was covered by a separate agreement with an individual as beneficiary of the will rather than as executor and it was not authorized or approved by the probate court, the allowance to attorney of fee for administration work in connection with estate in excess of the fee schedule was not justified and attorney was not entitled to the $2,000 for preparation of estate tax return. Warfield v. Burnside, 240 Ark. 316, 399 S.W.2d 676 (1966).

Where a portion of the heirs and distributees employed an attorney to contest the settlement of the executor, the probate court had no power to direct the payment of the attorney's fee by the executor out of the residuary fund of the estate; if it was a proper case for contribution by all interested in the estate, the remedy was in chancery only. McPaxton v. Dickson, 15 Ark. (2 Barber) 97 (1854) (decision under prior law).

An attorney could, in equity, subject the assets of an estate to the payment of his fee where his services were of value to the estate and the administrator was insolvent. Pike v. Thomas, 65 Ark. 437, 47 S.W. 110 (1898) (decision under prior law).

An administrator was held to be a trustee and could not profit on claims against the estate; rather, he would be allowed only what he paid for them, plus interest. Wolf v. Banks, 41 Ark. 104 (1883) (decision under prior law).

An executor or administrator was entitled to be indemnified out of the assets of the estate for expenditures made or liabilities incurred in the legitimate exercise of his trust. State ex rel. Altheimer v. Hunter, 56 Ark. 159, 19 S.W. 496 (1892) (decision under prior law).

Although an executor voluntarily paid the funeral expenses of the deceased, he was entitled to credit therefor as expenses incident to administration of the estate. Holt v. Cassinelli, 203 Ark. 1138, 160 S.W.2d 877 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Allowance of insurance premiums paid by a personal representative was justified. Holland v. Doke, 135 Ark. 372, 205 S.W. 648 (1918) (decision under prior law).

An administrator was entitled to his advances for the estate plus six percent simple interest. Trimble v. James, 40 Ark. 393 (1883) (decision under prior law).

Money expended by an administrator in the preservation of an estate could be allowed as expenses of administration on final settlement, but a representative of a deceased administrator could not collect expenses of administration from an estate unless there had been an accounting. Smith v. Davis, 51 Ark. 415, 11 S.W. 681 (1889) (decision under prior law).

An executor not entitled to compensation under a will was entitled to allowance for legitimate expenses incurred in the care and management of the estate. Hill v. Zanone, 184 Ark. 594, 43 S.W.2d 238 (1931) (decision under prior law).

An administrator was entitled to ordinary expenses, but needed to file an itemized statement showing the necessity therefor. Scroggins v. Osborn Co., 181 Ark. 424, 26 S.W.2d 95 (1930) (decision under prior law).

It was not error to allow an administrator necessary traveling expenses. Holland v. Doke, 135 Ark. 372, 205 S.W. 648 (1918) (decision under prior law).

Former statute fixed the compensation of an administrator for his entire trouble and risk in attending to the settlement of an estate, and not merely for collecting its debts. The probate judge could allow as such compensation the maximum percent upon the value of the estate fixed by statute, or he could, in the exercise of sound discretion, allow less than the maximum, according to the circumstances of the case. Ex parte Bell, 14 Ark. (1 Barber) 76 (1853) (decision under prior law).

A probate court may fix the compensation to be allowed an administrator, but it cannot exceed the rates set by statute. Souter v. Fly, 182 Ark. 791, 33 S.W.2d 408 (1931) (decision under prior law).

Where the successor administrator collected rents and made disbursements, and there was no evidence that it made any discretionary or time-consuming judgments with respect to the management of the real estate, there was no evidence of “substantial services” having been performed; therefore, the successor administrator was not entitled to extra fees in excess of the listed percentages. Sloss v. Farmers Bank & Trust Co., 290 Ark. 304, 719 S.W.2d 273 (1986).

Circuit court did not abuse its discretion in allowing a coexecutor of a decedent's estate a $5000 executor's fee, under subsection (c) of this section, because the circuit court considered the proper factors because (1) the coexecutor was found not to have acted so as to intentionally harm the widow and to have provided valuable services to the estate; (2) the circuit court found that the undervaluation of the estate property could have harmed the heirs in terms of estate taxes and that the coexecutor's actions (such as the construction of the will) benefitted some of the heirs to the detriment of other heirs; and (3) the circuit court found that a higher fee was warranted.Taylor v. Woods, 102 Ark. App. 92, 282 S.W.3d 285 (2008), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Ark. App. LEXIS 625 (Aug. 20, 2008).

Fees awarded to an executor from a testator's son were not excessive under subsection (a) of this section because the executor, who coordinated a judicial sale of the real and personal property while struggling with the behavior of the son, testified about the necessity of the services, the lack of duplication, and the huge role that the son played in delaying the closing of the estate.Shafer v. Estate of Shafer, 2012 Ark. App. 177, 393 S.W.3d 565 (2012).

Upon appeal from a probate court's confirmation of an administrator's account of settlement, he could be allowed commissions in the circuit court, though he credited himself with none and none were allowed by the probate court. Williams v. Cubage, 36 Ark. 307 (1880) (decision under prior law).

An administrator could not bind an estate by contract to pay his fee. Pike v. Thomas, 62 Ark. 223, 35 S.W. 212 (1896) (decision under prior law).

The destruction or larceny of notes did not entitle the administrator to credit for them; they could still be collected by a suit for lost instruments. Williams v. Cubage, 36 Ark. 307 (1880) (decision under prior law).

The fact that an account current was approved without allowing credit for uncollected items did not constitute a final adjudication that such items were collectible, nor preclude an order allowing credit therefor when it was found that the items were uncollectible. Holland v. Doke, 135 Ark. 372, 205 S.W. 648 (1918) (decision under prior law).

Where evidence was to the effect that executor operated testator's department store for about one year during which time about $158,000 passed through its hands and there was hardly a day during a two-year period that executor did not perform some duty in connection with the administration of the estate and where the personal property of the estate was valued at $77,977.98 and the real estate at $66,000, an executor's fee of $5,000 was held to be not excessive. However, on rehearing where it was established that the actual operation of the store was under the management of third persons and that the work by the executor was not substantially greater than that usually done by personal representatives the fee was reduced to $2,489.34 as to the personalty and $250 as to the realty. Saad v. Arkansas Trust Co., 225 Ark. 33, 280 S.W.2d 894 (1955).

An administrator was not allowed to profit by discounting claims. Jacoway v. Hall, 67 Ark. 340, 55 S.W. 12 (1900) (decision under prior law).

Allowance of commissions to executor, for his risk and trouble and for improvements put on testator's real estate, was a matter within the jurisdiction of the probate court, and its judgment was conclusive in the absence of showing fraud in the allowance. Ringgold v. Stone, 20 Ark. (7 Barber) 526 (1859) (decision under prior law).

It was within the discretion of the probate court to allow the maximum compensation for services as an administrator, and this discretion would not be disturbed unless abused. Triplett v. Chipman, 153 Ark. 12, 240 S.W. 23 (1922) (decision under prior law).

A trial court did not abuse its discretionary authority in allowing only a $4,000 executor's fee where a five-year delay in administration of an Arkansas estate was primarily due to the executor's initiating the original probate in Mississippi in disregard of advice of counsel. Estate of Torian v. Smith, 263 Ark. 304, 564 S.W.2d 521 (1978), cert. denied, First Nat'l Bank v. Smith, 439 U.S. 883, 99 S. Ct. 223, 58 L. Ed. 2d 195 (1978).

An administrator was not entitled to a commission on the proceeds of a sale of property belonging to his intestate made under a decree in chancery foreclosing a mortgage. Reynolds v. Canal & Banking Co., 30 Ark. 520 (1875) (decision under prior law).

Where a will provided that the executor should be allowed such fees as by law are allowed to administrators and executors, the executor was entitled to the fees allowed by statute. State Nat'l Bank v. Fisher, 186 Ark. 42, 52 S.W.2d 51 (1932) (decision under prior law).

A testator could limit the executor's compensation by terms of his will, as statutory provisions applied only when a will did not otherwise provide. Gordon v. Greening, 121 Ark. 617, 182 S.W. 272 (1916) (decision under prior law).

If nothing passed through an administrator's hands, he was entitled to no fees. Adamson v. Parker, 74 Ark. 168, 85 S.W. 239 (1905) (decision under prior law).

The entitlement of an administrator to compensation was questionable where she had not made a proper accounting, where the real property had not become an asset in the hands of the personal representative, where she had not been authorized to operate a business, and by the fact that she would receive and retain all the personal estate. Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Where a widow was the administrator of the estate, it did not affect her right to receive commissions. Sharp v. Himes, 129 Ark. 327, 196 S.W. 131 (1917) (decision under prior law).

A widow was entitled to only $3,000 as compensation for her services as executor, pursuant to this section, rather than the statutory maximum of $49,000, which she computed based on an estate in excess of $1,770,000, since the evidence showed that she was 87 years old, in poor health, and that her brother, an attorney and accountant, largely performed the work done. Hanna v. Hanna, 273 Ark. 399, 619 S.W.2d 655 (1981).

Cited: City of Hot Springs v. Creviston, 288 Ark. 286, 705 S.W.2d 415 (1986); Amant v. Callahan, 341 Ark. 857, 20 S.W.3d 896 (2000).

Where attorneys appointed by the court to represent an administrator had worked two or three weeks negotiating with the proper authorities for the restoration of a drug and narcotic permit in connection with the operation of a drug store and had had weekly conferences with the administrator over a period from June 21, 1960, through January 31, 1962, an attorney's fee of $2,500 for such services was justified, it being less than the statutory fee. Black v. Thompson, 235 Ark. 725, 361 S.W.2d 753 (1962).

Decedent's brother, who unsuccessfully attempted to probate an allegedly lost will of the decedent, was not entitled to recover fees and expenses under subsection (a) of this section as he was not nominated as the executor of that will and he did not qualify as an administrator with the will annexed as the will was never deemed valid and admitted to probate.Abdin v. Abdin, 101 Ark. App. 56, 270 S.W.3d 361 (2007).

Where attorneys entered into a contractual arrangement with the principal beneficiary of a will who was also the executor named therein for a contingent fee, they were estopped from pursuing the alternative course of seeking a fee from the decedent's estate on a quantum meruit basis when defense of principal will proved unsuccessful. Warfield v. Burnside, 240 Ark. 316, 399 S.W.2d 676 (1966).

The good or bad faith of a person offering a will for probate is not controlling as to the allowance of the attorney fees, but rather the fact that the attorneys were appointed by the court to represent the administrator of the estate and thereafter rendered services in behalf of the estate entitles them to remuneration. Black v. Thompson, 235 Ark. 725, 361 S.W.2d 753 (1962).

The record did not support allegation that administrator did not act in “good faith” under this section in offering the will for probate, and, in considering her background, it could not be assumed that she acted in bad faith when in fact she would have been remiss in her duty had she failed to offer the will for probate, especially where it was not established that she helped procure it. Black v. Thompson, 235 Ark. 725, 361 S.W.2d 753 (1962).

Effective Dates. Acts 1951, No. 255, § 15: Mar. 19, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly has ascertained that there is a likelihood of misconstruction of certain provisions of the Probate Code, and that an urgent need exists for clarification thereof and certain additions thereto in order that the law relating to proceedings in probate may be construed and administered in a uniform manner throughout the State, in accordance with the legislative intent; for the accomplishment of which purposes this Act is adopted. An emergency is therefore declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, welfare and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1961, No. 17, § 3: Jan. 30, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that the present laws pertaining to the requirement of a bond by a personal representative which is a bank are unjust and inadequate, now therefore, this act is necessary to remedy this existing situation and will remedy the same, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 620, § 16: July 1, 1975.

Am. Jur. 31 Am. Jur. 2d, Exec. & Ad., § 122 et seq.

C.J.S. 33 C.J.S., Exec. & Ad., §§ 71-77.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

A cause of action did not accrue upon an administrator's bond until his accounts were settled and an order made by the court directing him to pay the amount found due to the parties entitled to receive it. George v. Elms, 46 Ark. 260 (1885); State ex rel. McCreary v. Roth, 47 Ark. 222, 1 S.W. 98 (1886) (preceding decisions under prior law).

When a probate court made a settlement of a deceased administrator's accounts before an administrator was appointed on his estate, neither the principal nor his sureties were legally before the court, and such settlement would not be a cause of action on the bond. State v. Drake, 52 Ark. 350, 12 S.W. 706 (1889) (decision under prior law).

If the accounts of an administrator showing nothing due from him were confirmed by the probate court, no liability would rest upon his sureties until the settlement thus made was impeached in a court of equity. Crouch v. Edwards, 52 Ark. 499, 12 S.W. 1070 (1889) (decision under prior law).

It was within the power of the probate court, on the application of a surety in an administrator's bond, to require the administrator to give a new bond when it was made to appear that the sureties in his bond were insufficient. Renfro v. White, 23 Ark. (10 Barber) 195 (1861) (decision under prior law).

On affidavit filed by interested party in an estate that the administrator was insolvent, it was error for the probate court to revoke the letters of administration without requiring the administrator to give additional bond and without showing that his securities were not ample. Collier v. Kilcrease, 27 Ark. 10 (1871) (decision under prior law).

A probate court had no authority, on application of guardian, to substitute new bonds and sureties for old bonds and sureties theretofore approved and accepted by it for reasons which are not provided by statute. White v. New Amsterdam Cas. Co., 195 Ark. 249, 111 S.W.2d 477 (1937) (decision under prior law).

Where a surety upon a guardian's bond who had been compelled to pay over money due by the guardian upon termination of the fiduciary relation sued his cosurety for contribution, it was no defense that the plaintiff consented that the guardian might retain and use the ward's money by paying interest therefor and that the probate court thereupon made an order reciting such consent and authorizing the guardian to retain the money “until further order.” Berton v. Anderson, 56 Ark. 470, 20 S.W. 250 (1892) (decision under prior law).

The liability of a surety on an administrator's bond was not discharged by the surety's death, but extended to the entire term of the administrator. Hecht v. Scaggs, 53 Ark. 291, 13 S.W. 930 (1890) (decision under prior law).

Where a will provided for appointment of widow as executor without giving bond and without making reports and settlements, the remainderman in the estate had no right to require a bond and an accounting from the widow who was a life tenant, without alleging and proving mismanagement, waste, or conversion. Dillen v. Fancher, 197 Ark. 995, 125 S.W.2d 110 (1939) (decision under prior law).

Where letters testamentary were granted by the clerk, in vacation, he had no discretion in any case to dispense with the bond required by statute, even where the will directed otherwise; rather, in such matters the probate court had a large discretion, which would not be controlled by the Supreme Court, unless abused. Dillen v. Fancher, 197 Ark. 995, 125 S.W.2d 110 (1939) (decision under prior law).

The sureties on an administrator's bond could apply to the probate court to be discharged on any statutory ground; however, such an application could not be made under a former statute relating to the discharge of sureties on official bonds. Valcourt v. Sessions, 30 Ark. 515 (1875) (decision under prior law).

Where guardian and sureties were before the probate court and an order permitting substitution of surety, approving new bond, and releasing the sureties on the original bond was made by the court of its own motion, but not entered on the record, an order nunc pro tunc, directing that it be shown on the judgment record, was proper, but the order did not discharge former sureties from liability that might have accrued prior to the order. Williams v. Goodwin, 200 Ark. 897, 141 S.W.2d 515 (1940) (decision under prior law).

The primary liability of a guardian who had been removed by the court should have been determined before a judgment was entered against the surety on the guardian's bond. Continental Ins. Cos. v. Estate of Rowan, 250 Ark. 724, 466 S.W.2d 942 (1971).

The giving of a bond by a guardian was held to be a condition precedent to the issuance of letters of guardianship and the authority to act as a guardian. Norris v. Dunn, 184 Ark. 511, 43 S.W.2d 77 (1931) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Sulcer v. Northwestern Nat'l Ins. Co., 263 Ark. 583, 566 S.W.2d 397 (1978).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 186; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3108.